Utah statutes.
19-4-111.1.   Provision of fluoridated water -- Request of resident.

A public water system in a county of the first or second class whose entire water inventory is fluoridated may supply water to a residence or business in a municipality that is located in two counties, one that has approved fluoridation and one that has not approved fluoridation in accordance with Section 19-4-111 if:

(1)  the owner requests that the public water system supply water to the residence or business;

(2)  no reasonable alternative water supply exists; and

(3)  the owner's request can be fulfilled without affecting other residences or businesses in the municipality or county that has not approved fluoridation.



Amended by Chapter 321, 2013 General Session

